Wisconsin, session 2025, SB321.
do enact as follows:SB321,11Section 1. 29.219 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:SB321,5,5229.219 (4) Husband and wife Spouses resident licenses. A combined 3husband and wife spouses resident fishing license shall be issued subject to s. 429.024 by the department to residents applying for this license. This license confers 5upon both husband and wife spouses the privileges of resident fishing licenses.SB321,26Section 2. 29.228 (5) of the statutes is amended to read:SB321,5,10729.228 (5) Annual family fishing license. The department shall issue a 8nonresident annual family fishing license, subject to s. 29.024, to any nonresident 9who applies for this license. This license entitles the husband, wife spouses and any 10minor children to fish under this license.SB321,311Section 3. 29.228 (6) of the statutes is amended to read:SB321,6,21229.228 (6) Fifteen-day family fishing license. The department shall issue 13a nonresident 15-day family fishing license, subject to s. 29.024, to any nonresident 1who applies for this license. This license entitles the husband, wife spouses and any 2minor children to fish under this license.SB321,43Section 4. 29.229 (2) (i) of the statutes is amended to read:SB321,6,4429.229 (2) (i) Husband and wife Spouses fishing licenses.SB321,55Section 5. 29.2295 (2) (i) of the statutes is amended to read:SB321,6,6629.2295 (2) (i) Husband and wife Spouses fishing licenses.SB321,67Section 6. 29.563 (3) (a) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:SB321,6,8829.563 (3) (a) 3. Husband and wife Spouses: $30.25.SB321,79Section 7. 29.607 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:SB321,6,191029.607 (3) License required; exceptions; wild rice identification card. 11Every person over the age of 16 and under the age of 65 shall obtain the appropriate 12wild rice license to harvest or deal in wild rice but no license to harvest is required 13of the members of the immediate family of a licensee or of a recipient of old-age 14assistance or members of their immediate families. The department, subject to s. 1529.024 (2g) and (2r), shall issue a wild rice identification card to each member of a 16licensee’s immediate family, to a recipient of old-age assistance and to each member 17of the recipient’s family. The term “immediate family” includes husband and wife 18spouses and minor children having their abode and domicile with the parent or 19legal guardian.SB321,820Section 8. 45.01 (6) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:SB321,6,232145.01 (6) (c) The biological natural or adoptive parent or a person who acts in 22the place of a parent and who has so acted for not less than 12 months prior to the 23veteran’s entrance into active service.SB321,91Section 9. 45.51 (3) (c) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:SB321,7,3245.51 (3) (c) 2. The department may deviate from this sequence upon order of 3the board to prevent the separation of a husband and wife spouses.SB321,104Section 10. 45.51 (5) (a) 1. b. of the statutes is amended to read:SB321,7,8545.51 (5) (a) 1. b. Was married to the person under sub. (2) (a) 1. or 2. at the 6time the person entered the service and who became a widow or widower surviving 7spouse by the death of the person while in the service or as a result of physical 8disability of the person incurred during the service.SB321,119Section 11. 45.51 (5) (a) 1. c. of the statutes is amended to read:SB321,7,131045.51 (5) (a) 1. c. The period during which the surviving spouse was married 11to and lived with the deceased person under sub. (2) (a) 1. or 2. plus the period of 12widowhood or widowerhood after the death of the deceased person is 6 months or 13more.SB321,1214Section 12. 45.55 of the statutes is amended to read:SB321,8,61545.55 Notes and mortgages of minor veterans. Notwithstanding any 16provision of this chapter or any other law to the contrary, any minor who served in 17the active armed forces of the United States at any time after August 27, 1940, and 18the husband or wife spouse of such a minor may execute, in his or her own right, 19notes or mortgages, as defined in s. 851.15, the payment of which is guaranteed or 20insured by the U.S. department of veterans affairs or the federal housing 21administrator under the servicemen’s readjustment act of 1944, the national 22housing act, or any acts supplementing or amending these acts. In connection with 23these transactions, the minors may sell, release, or convey the mortgaged property 1and litigate or settle controversies arising therefrom, including the execution of 2releases, deeds, and other necessary papers or instruments. The notes, mortgages, 3releases, deeds, and other necessary papers or instruments when so executed are 4not subject to avoidance by the minor or the husband or wife spouse of the minor 5upon either or both of them attaining the age of 18 because of the minority of either 6or both of them at the time of the execution thereof.SB321,137Section 13. 46.03 (34) of the statutes is amended to read:SB321,8,14846.03 (34) Fetal alcohol syndrome and drug danger information. The 9department shall acquire, without cost if possible, information that describes the 10causes and effects of fetal alcohol syndrome and the dangers to a fetus from the 11mother’s use of cocaine or other drugs by the pregnant person during pregnancy 12and shall distribute the information free of charge to each county clerk so that each 13county clerk may provide information to marriage license applicants under s. 14765.12 (1) (a) and domestic partnership applicants under s. 770.07 (2).SB321,1415Section 14. 46.10 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:SB321,9,211646.10 (2) Except as provided in subs. (2m) and (14) (b) and (c), any person, 17including but not limited to a person admitted, committed, protected, or placed 18under s. 975.01, 1977 stats., s. 975.02, 1977 stats., s. 975.17, 1977 stats., s. 55.05 (5), 192003 stats., and s. 55.06, 2003 stats., and ss. 51.10, 51.13, 51.15, 51.20, 51.35 (3), 2051.37 (5), 51.45 (10), (11), (12) and (13), 55.05, 55.055, 55.12, 55.13, 55.135, 971.14 21(2) and (5), 971.17 (1), 975.06 and 980.06, receiving care, maintenance, services, 22and supplies provided by any institution in this state including University of 23Wisconsin Hospitals and Clinics, in which the state is chargeable with all or part of 1the person’s care, maintenance, services, and supplies, any person receiving care 2and services from a county department established under s. 51.42 or 51.437 or from 3a facility established under s. 49.73, and any person receiving treatment and 4services from a public or private agency under s. 980.06 (2) (c), 1997 stats., s. 980.08 5(5), 2003 stats., or s. 971.17 (3) (d) or (4) (e) or 980.08 (4) (g) and the person’s 6property and estate, including the homestead, and the spouse of the person, and the 7spouse’s property and estate, including the homestead, and, in the case of a minor 8child, the parents of the person, and their property and estates, including their 9homestead, and, in the case of a foreign child described in s. 48.839 (1) who became 10dependent on public funds for his or her primary support before an order granting 11his or her adoption, the resident of this state appointed guardian of the child by a 12foreign court who brought the child into this state for the purpose of adoption, and 13his or her property and estate, including his or her homestead, shall be liable for the 14cost of the care, maintenance, services, and supplies in accordance with the fee 15schedule established by the department under s. 46.03 (18). If a spouse, widow 16surviving spouse, or minor, or an incapacitated person may be lawfully dependent 17upon the property for their support, the court shall release all or such part of the 18property and estate from the charges that may be necessary to provide for those 19persons. The department shall make every reasonable effort to notify the liable 20persons as soon as possible after the beginning of the maintenance, but the notice 21or the receipt thereof is not a condition of liability.SB321,1522Section 15. 46.238 of the statutes is amended to read:SB321,9,232346.238 Infants and Infant or unborn children whose mothers abuse 1child of a person who has abused controlled substances, controlled 2substance analogs, or alcohol during pregnancy. If an agency, as defined in s. 348.981 (1) (ag), receives a report under s. 146.0255 (2) or 146.0257 (2) and that 4agency is a county department under s. 46.22 or 46.23 or a licensed child welfare 5agency under contract with that county department, the agency shall offer to 6provide appropriate services and treatment to the infant and the infant’s mother 7person who gave birth to the infant or to the unborn child, as defined in s. 48.02 8(19), and the expectant mother of person pregnant with the unborn child or the 9agency shall make arrangements for the provision of appropriate services and 10treatment. If an agency receives a report under s. 146.0255 (2) or 146.0257 (2) and 11that agency is the department or a licensed child welfare agency under contract 12with the department, the agency shall refer the report to the county department 13under s. 51.42 or 51.437 and that county department shall offer to provide, or make 14arrangements for the provision of, those services and that treatment. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb321 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb321 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB321 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB321 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB321: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting